North Carolina statutes. Chapter 113. Conservation and Development.
Article 9A. Regulation of Trapping. [Repealed]

§§ 113-113.6 through 113-113.19.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1979, c. 830, s. 1.

Cross References.

For present game laws, see Subchapter IV of this Chapter,

G.S. 113-127

et seq.

For repealed sections and local acts continued in effect as to particular counties, see

G.S. 113-133.1

.